Idaho, session 2025, H0170.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-4761, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-4761. IDAHO BROADBAND ADVISORY BOARD. (1) There is hereby created
within the department of commerce the Idaho broadband advisory board. The
advisory board shall consist of three (3) members of the house of represen-
tatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, three (3)
members of the senate appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate,
one (1) nonvoting member with experience and knowledge of the broadband in-
dustry appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, one (1) non-
voting member with experience and knowledge of the broadband industry ap-
pointed by the president pro tempore of the senate, and three (3) members of
the public appointed by the governor.
(2) The advisory board shall be responsible for creating a statewide
broadband plan that will determine the manner of structuring, prioritiz-
ing, and dispersing grants from the Idaho broadband fund to areas of the
state that are most in need and shall have the authority to determine which
broadband projects are undertaken pursuant to this section. Any grant award
process shall be conducted and evaluated by an independent third party, and
the independent third party shall provide recommendations to the advisory
board. In the preparation, adoption, and implementation of the statewide
broadband plan, the advisory board shall solicit the participation and as-
sistance of state agencies with pertinent expertise. All agencies of the
state of Idaho shall cooperate with the advisory board by providing re-
quested research, information, and studies pertaining in any manner to the
statewide broadband plan.
(3) Once the statewide broadband plan has been adopted by a majority
vote of the broadband advisory board, copies of the plan shall be filed in the
office of the governor, posted on the website of the advisory board or the de-
partment of commerce, and published and distributed in any other manner de-
termined appropriate by the advisory board.
(4) Following adoption of the statewide broadband plan, the board shall
administer the implementation of the plan and shall maintain and revise the
plan as necessary.
(5) Any state agency may petition the board to revise the statewide
broadband plan. The board shall review any petition filed pursuant to this


section within three (3) months after it is filed and shall either take ac-
tion to revise the broadband plan or set forth its reasons for denying the
request in writing.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.